Hawaii statutes.
§15-2 Who may vote by absentee ballot.
Any person registered to vote may cast an absentee ballot in the manner
provided in this chapter and rules adopted by the chief election officer. [L
1975, c 36, pt of §3; am L 1980, c 248, §1(a); am L 1981, c 29, §1(1); am L
1984, c 149, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1993, c 230, §2]

Case Notes

Section not unconstitutional. 623 F. Supp. 657.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next